Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1697XS (2) 91 lh/ko S.F. 327 Section 1. DENTAL WELLNESS PLAN AND DENTAL WELLNESS PLAN 1 KIDS ââ PROVIDER REIMBURSEMENT. A provider participating in 2 the dental wellness plan or the dental wellness plan kids 3 shall be reimbursed for services at the percentage of the 4 usual, customary, and reasonable fee or at the percentage of 5 the commercial dental insurance billed charges, whichever is 6 higher, to align dental provider reimbursement rates under the 7 dental wellness plan and the dental wellness plan kids with 8 reimbursement rates under the healthy and well kids in Iowa 9 (Hawki) program pursuant to chapter 514I, in order to maximize 10 dental provider participation in and member access under the 11 dental wellness plan and the dental wellness plan kids. 12